Washington statutes.
RCW 35A.07.060

Resolution for election.

The legislative body of a charter city may, by resolution, submit to the voters at an election held within the time period specified in RCW 35A.07.050 a proposal that the city adopt the classification of charter code city and be governed under the provisions of this title with the powers conferred hereby.

[ 1967 ex.s. c 119 s 35A.07.060.]